Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168E.01, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Retail delivery. (a) "Retail delivery" means a delivery to a person located in Minnesota of deleted text begin the following items as part of a retail sale:deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end tangible personal property that is subject to taxation under chapter 297Adeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin , as part of a retail sale.new text end deleted text begin (2) clothing, as defined under section 297A.67, subdivision 8, excluding cloth and disposable child and adult diapers. deleted text end (b) Retail delivery does not include pickup at the retailer's place of business, including curbside delivery. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168E.01, subdivision 4, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-00076 168E.01 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 4. Clothing. "Clothing" has the meaning given in section 297A.67, subdivision 8.